Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5988.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:(1) The department may apply for approval by the United States department of health and human services to accredit opioid treatment programs pursuant to the requirements in 42 C.F.R. Part 8.(2) If the department is approved by the United States department of health and human services as an accrediting body under 42 C.F.R. Part 8, the department shall:(a) Execute its responsibilities as the accrediting body pursuant to policies and procedures approved by the United States department of health and human services; and(b) Establish accreditation fees in rule.(3) The department shall set accreditation fees including, but not limited to, an initial accreditation fee and a renewal fee, at levels sufficient to cover the costs associated with the accreditation services it provides under 42 C.F.R. Part 8.(4) The department may use appropriations from the opioid abatement settlement account to offset the cost to the department of providing accreditation services under 42 C.F.R. Part 8.--- END ---